apertium-es-ast.es.dix
  <pardef n="comp/etir__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiríamos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiría</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiríais</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etirías</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etirían</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiría</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiremos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiré</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiréis</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etirás</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etirán</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etirá</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiéremos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiere</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiereis</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itieres</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itieren</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiere</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiendo</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiéndo</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etimos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etí</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etisteis</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etiste</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itieron</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itió</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etid</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etid</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etí</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__suscribí"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etíd</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íte</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sábe"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etir</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etir</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etír</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etíamos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etía</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etíais</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etías</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etían</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etía</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiéramos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itiésemos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiera</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itiese</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itierais</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itieseis</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itieras</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itieses</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itieran</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itiesen</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itiera</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>itiese</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etidas</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etida</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etidos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etido</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>etido</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etimos</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ito</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>etís</l>
        <r>etir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ites</l>

<e><i>comp</i><par n="comp/etir__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>rep</i><par n="comp/etir__vblex"/></e>
